Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.260

Conflict with federal requirements—Effect—Rules to conform chapter.

If any part of this chapter shall be found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a condition precedent to the allocation of federal funds to the state, such conflicting part of this chapter is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of such conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such findings or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter in its application to the agencies concerned. The office of financial management and the department of enterprise services, as appropriate, shall make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to meet federal requirements which are a condition precedent to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 417; 1961 c 1 s 26 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.